Mississippi, session 2026, HB1552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-7-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-7-19.  (1)  Except as provided in Section 33-1-39, all licenses shall be renewed biennially under the fee schedule in Section 73-7-29.  Applications for renewal of licenses for cosmetologists, barbers, estheticians, nail technicians and instructors must be accompanied by the required renewal fee.  A grace period of sixty (60) days will be given in which to renew the license.  Upon the expiration of the grace period of sixty (60) days, any applicant for the renewal of a license will be required to pay the required renewal fee and a delinquent fee in addition to the renewal fee.  The fees may be paid according to the manner prescribed by the board in rules and regulations.  Checks returned to the board because of insufficient funds shall result in nonrenewal of the license, which will require the penalty fee for insufficient fund checks plus all other amounts due for renewal of the license before the license may be renewed.  After one (1) year has passed from the expiration date of the license, a delinquent fee must be paid for each year up to three (3) years, after which the required examination must be taken before a license can be renewed, except as authorized under subsection (2) of this section.  All applications for examination required by this chapter shall expire ninety (90) days from the date thereof. (2)  The board may allow, on an individual basis, a licensee whose license is not renewed within three (3) years after the expiration date of the license to renew his or her license without having to take the examination, if the license has not been expired for more than five (5) years and the licensee (a) submits a written application to the board with an explanation of any extenuating circumstances or other valid reasons for not timely renewing his or her license, (b) provides such other information as the board may require, (c) completes the number of clock hours of continuing education as required by the board, and (d) pays the delinquent fee for each year of the delinquency. ( * * *23)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. ( * * *34)  No license issued by the board may be renewed until all monetary fines and penalties assessed by the board to the licensee are paid in full. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.